Utah statutes.
62A-11-501.   Definitions -- Application.
(1)  The requirements of this part apply only to cases in which neither the
obligee nor the obligor is receiving IV-D services.
(2)  For purposes of this part the definitions contained in Section 62A-11-401
apply.
